Nebraska, session 109, LB373.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 39-1410, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
39-1410 (1) The section lines are hereby declared, but are not required,
to be public roads in each county in the state.
(2) The and, the county board of any county may, whenever the public good
requires it, open such roads on section lines without any preliminary survey
and cause them to be worked in the same manner as other public roads. ;
(3) Any Provided, any damages claimed by reason of any such road shall be
appraised and allowed in the manner provided by law.
(4)(a) The county board shall cause existing government corners along such
line to be perpetuated by:
(i) Causing causing to be planted monuments of some durable material, with
suitable witnesses; , and
(ii) Causing causing a record to be made of such monuments.
(b) If the same and, if government corners are lost or obliterated, the
county board shall cause the corners to be located in the manner provided in
sections 23-1907 and 23-1908 the manual of instruction for government surveys.
(c) The county board shall cause any such work to be done under this
section to be performed by the county surveyor or, if there is no county
surveyor in the county, by some other competent professional land surveyor.
Sec. 2. Section 39-1722, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
39-1722 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the The
county board of any county may by resolution, when it deems the public interest
may require vacation or abandonment of a public road of the county, direct the
county highway superintendent or in counties having no highway superintendent
then such person as the board may direct to study the use being made of such
public road and to submit in writing to the county board within thirty days, a
report upon the study made and the his or her recommendation of the directed
superintendent or person as to such the vacation or abandonment. Such thereof.
Said resolution and report shall be retained in the office of the county clerk
as a part of the permanent public records of the county board. ;
(2) The Provided, that the county board of any county shall not require
vacation or abandonment of any public road or any part of such road thereof
which is within the area of the zoning jurisdiction of a city of the
metropolitan, primary, or first class without the prior approval of the
governing body of such city.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the county
board of any county may by resolution propose to vacate or abandon a public
road that was previously declared a public road pursuant to section 39-1410 as
such section existed prior to the effective date of this act if it determines
such vacation or abandonment is in the interest of the public.
(b) No study is required to be conducted for a vacation or abandonment
under this subsection.
Sec. 3. Section 39-1724, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
39-1724 (1)(a) The Upon receipt of the report, as provided in section
39-1722, the county board shall adopt a resolution fixing the time, date, and
place for a public hearing on the issue of vacating or abandoning a public road
when: . Such
(i) The county board receives the report described in section 39-1722; or
(ii) The county board by resolution proposes to vacate or abandon a public
road that was previously declared a public road pursuant to section 39-1410 as
such section existed prior to the effective date of this act.
(b) The resolution fixing the time, date, and place for the public hearing
shall contain a clear and unambiguous description of the road to be vacated or
abandoned.
(2) The county board shall cause such resolution to be published once a
week for three consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published in the county
or, if none is published in the county, in a legal newspaper of general
circulation in the county.
(3)(a) Whenever possible the county board shall cause copies of such
resolution to be served by either registered or certified mail upon:
(i) The the owners of land abutting on or adjacent to the road to be
vacated or abandoned; and
(ii) The upon the planning and public works directors of a city of the
-1-

LB373 LB373
2025 2025
metropolitan, primary, or first class when such road or any part thereof is
within the area of the zoning jurisdiction of such city.
(b) Such copies shall be mailed by mailing the same to the last-known
address of each person described in subdivision (a) of this subsection owner
not less than two weeks in advance of the hearing.
Sec. 4. Section 39-1725, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
39-1725 (1) After the public hearing described in section 39-1724, the
county board shall, by resolution at its next meeting or as soon thereafter as
may be practicable, vacate or abandon or refuse vacation or abandonment, as in
the judgment of the board the public good may require.
(2) Vacation and abandonment shall not be ordered except upon vote of two-
thirds of all members of the county board and the prior approval of the
governing body of a city of the metropolitan, primary, or first class has been
obtained when any public road or any part thereof is within the area of the
zoning jurisdiction of such city. If such road lies within a township in a
county operating roads on a township basis, the road shall not be vacated or
abandoned unless an offer has been made to relinquish to the township in the
manner provided in section 39-1726.
(3) In the event that the county board decides to vacate or abandon a
public road, its resolution shall state upon what conditions, if any, the
vacation or abandonment shall be qualified and particularly whether or not the
title or right-of-way to any vacated or abandoned fragment or section of road
shall be sold, revert to private ownership, or remain in the public. If the
county board fails to specify in a resolution as to the disposition of right-
of-way, and if there shall be nonuse of such right-of-way for any public
purpose for a continuous period of not less than ten years, the right-of-way
shall revert to the owners of the adjacent real estate, one-half on each side
of such road thereof.
(4) When the county vacates all or any portion of a road, the county
shall, within thirty days after the effective date of the vacation, file a
certified copy of the vacating resolution with the register of deeds for the
county to be indexed against all affected lots.
Sec. 5. Original sections 39-1722, 39-1724, and 39-1725, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and section 39-1410, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-2-